Washington statutes.
RCW 18.110.030

Contract required—Provisions.

(1) An art dealer may accept a work of fine art on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist only if prior to or at the time of acceptance the art dealer enters into a written contract with the artist which states:

(a) The value of the work of fine art;

(b) The minimum price for the sale of the work of fine art; and

(c) The fee, commission, or other compensation basis of the art dealer.

(2) An art dealer who accepts a work of fine art on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist may use or display the work of fine art or a photograph of the work of fine art or permit the use or display of the work or photograph only if:

(a) Notice is given to users or viewers that the work of fine art is the work of the artist; and

(b) The artist gives prior written consent to the particular use or display.

(3) Any portion of a contract which waives any provision of this chapter is void.

[ 1981 c 33 s 3.]